Utah statutes.
32A-12-308.   Offering or soliciting bribes or gifts.
(1)  A person having sold, selling, or offering any alcoholic product for sale
to the commission or department may not offer, make, tender, or in any way
deliver or transfer any bribe, gift as defined in Section 67-16-5, or share of
profits to:
(a)  any commissioner;
(b)  the department director;
(c)  any department employee; or
(d)  any law enforcement officer responsible for the enforcement of this
title.
(2)  A commissioner, the department director, any department employee, or any
law enforcement officer responsible for the enforcement of this title may not
knowingly solicit, receive, accept, take, or seek, directly or indirectly, any
commission, compensation as defined in Section 67-16-3, gift as defined in
Section 67-16-5, or loan whatsoever from any person, association, or
corporation having sold, selling, or offering any alcoholic product for sale.
(3)  A violation of this section is punishable under the provisions of Section
67-16-12.
